Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1007.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 5-103.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-103.01. Prohibited activities An employee or appointee of the commission may not: 1. Enter into any business dealing, venture or contract with an owner or lessee of a race track racetrack or any permittee. 2. Be employed in any capacity by any race track or permittee. 3. Participate as an owner-trainer, trainer or jockey in any racing meeting conducted in this state. END_STATUTE 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.